Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201860-3,142
Fees; retention by county.

The various county treasurers acting as agents for the department
in collection of the fees shall retain five percent of each fee collected
under section 60-3,112 for credit
to the county general fund.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 142;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 48;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 79.